New York, session 2025-2026, A10669.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 43 of the military law, as 2 amended by chapter 722 of the laws of 2004, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. The naval force of the organized militia shall be the New York 5 naval militia and shall comprise the units and personnel forming the 6 naval militia of the state at this date and such other naval units as 7 may be organized hereafter including the personnel who are enlisted, 8 appointed or commissioned therein; provided, that ninety-five percent of 9 the persons who are members of the New York naval militia shall be 10 members of the United States naval reserve, the United States marine 11 corps reserve or the United States coast guard reserve. Members of the 12 New York naval militia may serve until reaching seventy-two years of 13 age. The maximum age to enlist or commission with the New York naval 14 militia with no prior military service shall be fifty years of age; 15 provided, however, that members serving as chaplains or in critical 16 medical fields may be enlisted or commissioned at or above such age upon 17 the issuance of a waiver by the commanding general officer. 18 § 2. Section 44 of the military law, as amended by chapter 442 of the 19 laws of 1958, is amended to read as follows: 20 § 44. The New York guard. 1. The New York guard, whenever a state 21 force shall be duly organized under the constitution and laws of the 22 United States and of the state, shall be a reserve land force of the 23 organized militia, and shall be commanded by a general officer. Members 24 of the New York guard may serve until reaching seventy-two years of age. 25 The maximum age to enlist or commission with the New York guard with no 26 prior military service shall be fifty years of age; provided, however, 27 that members serving as chaplains or in critical medical fields may be EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15254-01-6 A. 10669 2 1 enlisted or commissioned at or above such age upon the issuance of a 2 waiver by the commanding general officer. 3 2. All new members of the New York guard shall initially receive, with 4 costs reimbursed, two sets of field service uniforms and one set of 5 winter outerwear. The maximum cost per item of such field service 6 uniforms and such winter outerwear shall not exceed the cost from the 7 official uniform exchange. The commanding general officer shall deter- 8 mine and prescribe the initial items for the field service uniform. 9 3. All new members of the New York guard without prior military expe- 10 rience shall complete an initial accession training. All new members of 11 such guard with prior military service shall complete one full drill 12 weekend. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law.